Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Regents Retirement Health Benefit Fund

47-21-20.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Actuarial assumptions” means assumptions regarding the occurrence of future events affecting costs of the fund such as mortality, withdrawal, disability, and retirement; changes in compensation and offered post-employment benefits; rates of investment earnings and asset appreciation or depreciation; procedures used to determine the actuarial value of assets; and other relevant items.

“Actuarially sound” means that calculated contributions to the fund are sufficient to pay the full actuarial cost of the fund. The full actuarial cost includes both the normal cost of providing for fund obligations as they accrue in the future and the cost of amortizing the unfunded actuarial accrued liability over a period of no more than 30 years.

“Administrative expenses” means all expenses incurred in the operation of the fund, including all investment expenses.

“Annual required contribution” means the amount determined in accordance with requirements of Governmental Accounting Standards Board Statement No. 43, or any subsequent Governmental Accounting Standards Board statements that may be applicable to the fund.

“Board” means the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia.

“Covered health care expenses” means all actual health care expenses incurred by the health plan with respect to fund beneficiaries. Actual health care expenses include claims incurred with respect to fund beneficiaries and premiums incurred with respect to intermediary entities and health care providers by the health plan.

“Employer” means the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia and any department or institution of thereof that employs persons who are eligible to participate in the health plan.

“Fund” means the Board of Regents Retiree Health Benefit Fund established under this article.

“Health plan” means the board’s health insurance plans established pursuant to authority granted to the board pursuant to Code Sections 20-3-31 and 20-3-51.

“Obligations” means the administrative expenses of the fund and the cost of covered health care expenses incurred on behalf of fund beneficiaries less any amounts received by or on behalf of fund beneficiaries.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-21-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 68, § 3/SB 156.

47-21-21.
Creation of fund; purpose.

There is created the Board of Regents Retiree Health Benefit Fund to provide for the employer costs of retiree post-employment health insurance benefits. The fund shall be a trust fund of public funds. The board in its official capacity shall be its trustee and the Chancellor in his or her official capacity shall be its administrator.

The fund shall be available and dedicated without fiscal year limitations for covered health care expenses and administration costs. All employer and retiree contributions, appropriations, earnings, and reserves for the payment of obligations under this article shall be irrevocably credited to such fund. The amounts remaining in such fund, if any, after such health care expenses and administration costs have been paid shall be retained in such fund as a special reserve for covered health care expenses and administration costs. The board shall determine the time and amounts of distributions from the special reserve for covered health care expenses and administration costs. All assets of the fund shall be used solely for the payment of fund obligations and for no other purpose and shall be protected from creditors of the state and the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-21-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 68, § 3/SB 156.

47-21-22.
Operation of the fund; responsibilities.

Responsibility for the proper operation of the fund is vested in the board.

The board shall:

Adopt actuarial assumptions as necessary and prudent;

Employ such personnel as may be needed to carry out the provisions of this article and such personnel shall be employees of the board. The pro rata share of the costs of operating the board in the manner prescribed by law shall be a part of the administrative costs of the fund;

Maintain all necessary records regarding the fund in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, as applied to the fund;

Collect all moneys due to the fund and shall pay any administrative expenses necessary and appropriate for the operation of the fund from the fund; and

Cause to be prepared an annual report of fund activities. Such report shall include, but not be limited to, audited financial statements.

The board may:

Adopt any rules and regulations that it finds necessary to properly administer the fund;

Employ or contract for the services of actuaries and other professionals as required to carry out the duties established by this article; and

Contract with the Division of Investment Services of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia or such other investment advisers as deemed appropriate and prudent by the board for any necessary services with respect to fund investments.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the board shall be entitled to any information that it deems necessary and appropriate from a university employee retirement system in order that the provisions of this article may be carried out.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-21-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 68, § 3/SB 156; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “advisers” for “advisors” near the middle of paragraph (c)(3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-21-23.
Actuarial services.

The actuary employed or retained by the board shall provide technical advice to the board regarding the operation of the fund.

Utilizing the actuarial assumptions most recently adopted by the board, the actuary shall set the annual actuarial present values for the state plan for other post-employment benefits.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-21-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 68, § 3/SB 156.

47-21-24.
Administration of fund.

The board shall have control over the fund established by this article. The provisions provided for in this article and all administrative expenses shall be paid from the fund. The board may expend moneys from the fund for any purpose authorized by this article.

The board shall have full power to invest and reinvest its assets, subject to all of the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by Article 7 of Chapter 20 of Title 47, the “Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law.” Subject to such terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions, the board shall have full power to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any securities and investments in which any of the moneys are invested, including the proceeds of any investments and other moneys belonging to the fund.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no member or employee of the board shall have any personal interest in the gains or profits from any investment made by the board or use the assets of the fund in any manner, directly or indirectly, except to make such payments as may be authorized by the board in accordance with this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-21-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 68, § 3/SB 156.

47-21-25.
Annual duties.

The board shall annually determine the minimum annual required contributions sufficient to maintain the fund in an actuarially sound manner in accordance with Governmental Accounting Standards Board Statement No. 43, or any subsequent Governmental Accounting Standards Board statements that may be applicable to the fund.

The board may annually establish employer contribution rates for the purpose of establishing the health plan from fiscal year to fiscal year and additional employer contribution rates in accordance with the health plan for other post-employments benefits.

It shall be the responsibility of employers to make contributions to the fund in accordance with the employer contribution rates established by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-21-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 68, § 3/SB 156.